Maryland, session 2025, SB0909.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
2–110.
(a) In this section, “public service company” includes an electricity supplier and a
gas supplier as those terms are defined in § 1–101 of this article.
(b) (1) The costs and expenses of the Commission, THE STRATEGIC ENERGY
PLANNING OFFICE, and the Office of People’s Counsel shall be borne by the public service
companies that are subject to the Commission’s jurisdiction.
(2) The costs and expenses shall be assessed as provided in this section.
(3) The Commission shall pay the money that it collects for the assessment
under this section into the Public Utility Regulation Fund in the State Treasury established
under § 2–110.1 of this subtitle to reimburse the State for the expenses of the Commission,
THE STRATEGIC ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE, and the Office of People’s Counsel.
(c) (1) (i) Before each State fiscal year, the Chairman of the Commission
shall estimate the Commission’s total costs and expenses, including:
1. the compensation and expenses of the Commission, its
officers, agents, and personnel;
2. the cost of retirement contributions, Social Security,
health insurance, and other benefits required to be paid by the State for the personnel of
the Commission;

SENATE BILL 909 3
3. all other maintenance and operation expenses of the
Commission; and
4. all other direct and indirect costs of the Commission.
(ii) The estimate shall exclude the expenses associated with services
performed by the Commission for which the Commission is reimbursed under this division.
(iii) THE ESTIMATE SHALL INCLUDE, AS PROVIDED BY THE
STRATEGIC ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE:
1. THE COMPENSATION AND EXPENSES OF THE
STRATEGIC ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE, ITS OFFICERS, AGENTS, AND PERSONNEL;
2. THE COST OF RETIREMENT CONTRIBUTIONS, SOCIAL
SECURITY, HEALTH INSURANCE, AND OTHER BENEFITS REQUIRED TO BE PAID BY
THE STATE FOR THE PERSONNEL OF THE STRATEGIC ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE;
3. ALL OTHER MAINTENANCE AND OPERATION
EXPENSES OF THE STRATEGIC ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE; AND
4. ALL OTHER DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS OF THE
STRATEGIC ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE.
(IV) The estimate shall include, as provided by the Office of People’s
Counsel:
1. the compensation and expenses of the Office of People’s
Counsel, its officers, agents, and personnel;
2. the cost of retirement contributions, Social Security,
health insurance, and other benefits required to be paid by the State for the personnel of
the Office of People’s Counsel;
3. all other maintenance and operation expenses of the Office
of People’s Counsel; and
4. all other direct and indirect costs of the Office of People’s
Counsel.
(2) Based on the estimate, the Chairman shall determine the amount to be
paid by each public service company.
(3) The Commission shall send a bill to each public service company on or
before May 1 of each year.

SENATE BILL 909
(4) (i) The bill shall equal the product of:
1. the estimated total costs and expenses of the Commission,
THE STRATEGIC ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE, and the Office of People’s Counsel during
the next fiscal year; multiplied by
2. the ratio of the gross operating revenues for the public
service company derived from intrastate utility and electricity supplier operations in the
preceding calendar year, or other 12–month period as the Chairman determines, to the
total of the gross operating revenues derived from intrastate utility and electricity supplier
operations for all public service companies that are billed under this section over that
period.
(ii) To the extent that the Commission requires an electric company
to report the gross operating revenue derived from intrastate utility and electricity supplier
operation in order to calculate the bill under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, a small
rural electric cooperative described in § 7–502(a) of this article may satisfy the requirement
by submitting to the Commission an estimate made in accordance with a formula approved
by the Commission from information that the small rural electric cooperative submits to
the rural utilities service.
(5) The minimum bill for a public service company shall be $10.
(6) The public service company:
(i) shall pay the bill on or before the next July 15; or
(ii) may elect to make partial payments on the 15th days of July,
October, January, and April.
(7) A partial payment shall equal 25% of the bill and may not be less than
$10.
(8) During any State fiscal year, the Chairman may change the estimate of
costs and expenses of the Commission, THE ESTIMATE OF COSTS AND EXPENSES OF THE
STRATEGIC ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE, AS CHANGED BY THE STRATEGIC ENERGY
PLANNING OFFICE, and the estimate of costs and expenses of the Office of People’s
Counsel, as changed by the People’s Counsel.
(9) (i) If the estimate is changed, the Commission shall send a revised
bill to each public service company that has elected to make partial payments.
(ii) The change shall be apportioned equally against the remaining
payments for the fiscal year.

SENATE BILL 909 5
(10) (i) On or before September 15 of each year, the Chairman shall
compute:
1. the actual costs and expenses of the Commission[,];
2. THE ACTUAL COSTS AND EXPENSES OF THE
STRATEGIC ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE, AS PROVIDED BY THE STRATEGIC ENERGY
PLANNING OFFICE FOR THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR; and
3. the actual costs and expenses of the Office of People’s
Counsel, as provided by the People’s Counsel for the preceding fiscal year.
(ii) If the amounts collected are less than the actual costs and
expenses of the Commission, THE STRATEGIC ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE, and the
Office of the People’s Counsel, after deducting the amounts recovered under §§ 2–111(a)
and 2–123 of this subtitle, on or before October 15, the Chairman shall send to any public
service company that is affected a statement that shows the amount due.
(iii) If the amounts collected exceed the actual costs and expenses of
the Commission, THE STRATEGIC ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE, and the Office of the
People’s Counsel for the preceding fiscal year, the Commission shall deduct any excess
retained funds from the appropriation for the next fiscal year before the Commission
determines the amount to be paid by each public service company for the next fiscal year
under paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(11) A public service company shall pay an amount due within 30 days after
the statement is received.
(12) The total amount that may be charged to a public service company
under this section for a State fiscal year may not exceed:
(i) 0.50% of the public service company’s gross operating revenues
derived from intrastate utility and electricity supplier operations in the preceding calendar
year, or other 12–month period that the Chairman determines, for the costs and expenses
of the Commission other than that of the STRATEGIC ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE AND
THE Office of People’s Counsel; plus
(ii) 0.074% OF THOSE REVENUES FOR THE COSTS AND
EXPENSES OF THE STRATEGIC ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE; PLUS
(III) 0.074% of those revenues for the costs and expenses of the Office
of People’s Counsel.
(d) (1) Within 30 days after the Commission issues a bill under subsection (c)
of this section, the party billed may request a hearing as to the amount of the bill.

SENATE BILL 909
(2) Any amount of a bill that is not paid within 30 days after the date of
determination on a hearing or, if a hearing is not requested, on the date when payment is
due, shall bear annual interest at a rate, not less than 6%, that the Commission sets by
regulation.
2–110.1.
(a) There is a Public Utility Regulation Fund.
(b) The Fund consists of:
(1) all revenue received through the imposition and collection of
assessments under § 2–110 of this subtitle;
(2) fees received by the Commission under § 2–123 of this subtitle for
filings and for other services rendered by the Commission;
(3) income from investments that the State Treasurer makes for the Fund;
and
(4) any other fee, examination assessment, or revenue received by the
Commission under this division.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the Commission shall pay all
fines and penalties collected by the Commission under this article into the Resiliency Hub
Grant Program Fund established under § 9–2011 of the State Government Article.
(d) The purpose of the Fund is to pay all the costs and expenses incurred by the
Commission, THE STRATEGIC ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE, and the Office of People’s
Counsel that are related to the operation of the Commission, THE STRATEGIC ENERGY
PLANNING OFFICE, and the Office of People’s Counsel, including:
(1) expenditures authorized under this division; and
(2) any other expense authorized in the State budget.
(e) (1) All the costs and expenses of the Commission, THE STRATEGIC
ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE, and the Office of People’s Counsel shall be included in the
State budget.
(2) Expenditures from the Fund to cover costs and expenses of the
Commission, THE STRATEGIC ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE, and Office of People’s
Counsel may only be made:
(i) with an appropriation from the Fund approved by the General
Assembly in the State budget; or

SENATE BILL 909 7
(ii) by budget amendment in accordance with § 7–209 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article.
(f) (1) The State Treasurer is the custodian of the Fund.
(2) The State Treasurer shall deposit payments received from the
Commission into the Fund.
(g) (1) The Fund is a continuing, special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject
to § 7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, and may not be considered a part
of the General Fund of the State.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by law, no part of the Fund may revert or be
credited to:
(i) the General Fund of the State; or
(ii) any other special fund of the State.
SUBTITLE 12. INTEGRATED RESOURCE STRATEGIC ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE.
7–1201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DEMAND ELEMENT” MEANS A SPECIFIC FACTOR OR COMPONENT THAT
CONTRIBUTES TO THE OVERALL ELECTRICITY LOAD OR DEMAND.
(C) (B) “DIRECTOR” MEANS THE DIRECTOR OF THE INTEGRATED
RESOURCE STRATEGIC ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE.
(D) “FORECAST” MEANS THE COMPREHENSIVE ENERGY FORECAST.
(E) (C) “OFFICE” MEANS THE INTEGRATED RESOURCE STRATEGIC
ENERGY PLANNING OFFICE.
(D) “PJM REGION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–701 OF THIS TITLE.
(E) “RISK REPORT” MEANS THE COMPREHENSIVE WHOLESALE ENERGY
MARKETS AND BULK POWER SYSTEM RISK REPORT DEVELOPED UNDER § 7–1203
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7–1202.

SENATE BILL 909
(A) THERE IS AN INTEGRATED RESOURCE A STRATEGIC ENERGY
PLANNING OFFICE IN THE COMMISSION.
(B) (1) THE HEAD OF THE OFFICE IS THE DIRECTOR.
(2) (I) THE DIRECTOR SHALL:
(I) BE APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR WITH THE ADVICE AND
CONSENT OF THE SENATE; AND
(II) SERVE AT THE PLEASURE OF THE GOVERNOR.
(II) THE TERM OF THE DIRECTOR IS 5 YEARS AND BEGINS ON
JULY 1.
(III) AT THE END OF A TERM, THE DIRECTOR CONTINUES TO
SERVE UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(IV) A DIRECTOR WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN
SERVES FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
(V) A DIRECTOR MAY SERVE MORE THAN ONE TERM.
(3) THE GOVERNOR MAY REMOVE THE DIRECTOR FOR
INCOMPETENCE OR MISCONDUCT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–307 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(4) THE DIRECTOR IS ENTITLED TO A SALARY AS PROVIDED IN THE
STATE BUDGET.
(C) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE THE OFFICE WITH SUFFICIENT
STAFF AND RESOURCES TO PERFORM THE FUNCTIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) THE OFFICE SHALL HAVE THE STAFF PROVIDED FOR IN THE
STATE BUDGET.
(2) THE OFFICE MAY HIRE A PRIVATE CONSULTANT CONSULTANTS IF
NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) IN ORDER TO CARRY OUT THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
OFFICE SHALL COLLABORATE WITH:

SENATE BILL 909 9
(1) THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION;
(2) THE COMMISSION;
(3) THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM;
(4) THE MARYLAND CLEAN ENERGY CENTER; AND
(5) THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT.
(E) THE OFFICE SHALL COORDINATE WITH THE COMMISSION TO
ESTABLISH PROCEDURES AND RULES TO OBTAIN INFORMATION FROM ELECTRIC
COMPANIES AND GAS COMPANIES NECESSARY TO ACCOMPLISH THE OFFICE’S
DUTIES UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
7–1203.
(A) (1) EVERY 3 YEARS, THE OFFICE SHALL DEVELOP A
COMPREHENSIVE WHOLESALE ENERGY MARKETS AND BULK POWER SYSTEM RISK
REPORT.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE RISK REPORT IS TO:
(I) ASSESS WHOLESALE ENERGY MARKET FINANCIAL,
RESOURCE ADEQUACY, AND RELIABILITY RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH SERVING THE
STATE’S LONG–TERM ENERGY NEEDS; AND
(II) IDENTIFY ANY NECESSARY COST–EFFECTIVE SOLUTIONS
THAT ENSURE ELECTRIC SYSTEM RELIABILITY WHILE MEETING THE STATE’S
ENERGY POLICY GOALS.
(3) THE SOLUTIONS IDENTIFIED IN THE RISK REPORT SHALL SEEK
TO:
(I) MINIMIZE THE GROWTH OF THE COST OF ELECTRICITY OR
LOWER THE COST OF ELECTRICITY; AND
(II) MINIMIZE ENERGY RESOURCE RELIABILITY RISKS.
(B) (1) THE RISK REPORT SHALL INCLUDE ENERGY AND DEMAND
FORECASTS THAT CONTAIN:
(I) REASONABLE, 20–YEAR PROJECTIONS FOR ELECTRICITY
LOAD AND ENERGY DEMANDS FOR:

SENATE BILL 909
1. TRANSMISSION ZONES; AND
2. ELECTRIC SERVICE TERRITORIES; AND
(II) PROJECTIONS FOR MEETING STATE ENERGY NEEDS AND
CLEAN ENERGY GOALS AND LOAD FORECASTS IN THE PJM REGION, INCLUDING:
1. LOW, AVERAGE, AND HIGH PROJECTIONS OF ENERGY
DEMAND BASED ON STATE POLICIES AND OTHER REASONABLE ASSUMPTIONS THAT
IMPACT THE PROVISION OF ELECTRICITY IN THE STATE; AND
2. OTHER PROJECTIONS AS NECESSARY.
(2) IN COLLECTING THE DATA FOR THE FORECASTS UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE OFFICE SHOULD, BUT IS NOT REQUIRED
TO, USE:
(I) HISTORICAL AND PROJECTED INFORMATION FROM
ELECTRIC COMPANIES;
(II) LOAD FORECASTS FOR THE PJM REGION;
(III) APPROPRIATE ECONOMETRIC DATA FOR THE STATE; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE OFFICE CONSIDERS
APPROPRIATE.
(C) (1) THE OFFICE SHALL EXAMINE DIFFERENT WHOLESALE ENERGY
MARKET AND BULK POWER SYSTEM SCENARIOS TO SERVE THE FORECASTS UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) EACH SCENARIO EXAMINED SHALL:
(I) IDENTIFY THE RESULTING WHOLESALE ENERGY MARKET
AND BULK POWER SYSTEM FINANCIAL AND RESOURCE ADEQUACY IMPACTS OF
SERVING THE FORECASTS WITH THE EXISTING ELECTRIC SYSTEM, KNOWN
ADDITIONS TO THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM, AND ELECTRIC SYSTEM RESOURCE
RETIREMENTS; AND
(II) IDENTIFY RESOURCE AND DEMAND–SIDE MANAGEMENT
SOLUTIONS THAT MAY RESOLVE POTENTIAL RESOURCE ADEQUACY ISSUES AT THE
LEAST COST.

SENATE BILL 909 11
(3) FOR A SUBSET OF SCENARIOS THAT ARE PRIMARILY RELIED ON
WITHIN THE RISK REPORT, THE OFFICE SHALL, IN ADDITION TO THE
REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) IDENTIFY THE RESULTING WHOLESALE MARKET AND BULK
POWER SYSTEM RELIABILITY IMPACTS OF SERVING THE FORECASTS WITH THE
EXISTING ELECTRIC SYSTEM, KNOWN ADDITIONS TO THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM, AND
ELECTRIC SYSTEM RESOURCE RETIREMENTS; AND
(II) IDENTIFY RESOURCE AND DEMAND–SIDE MANAGEMENT
SOLUTIONS THAT MAY RESOLVE POTENTIAL RELIABILITY CONSTRAINTS AT THE
LEAST COST.
(4) EACH SCENARIO SHALL ALSO EXAMINE:
(I) DIFFERENT ENERGY RESOURCE MIXES TO MEET THE
STATE’S ENERGY NEEDS, INCLUDING THE USE OF DEMAND–SIDE MANAGEMENT;
(II) DIFFERENT APPROACHES FOR MEETING THE STATE’S
CLEAN ENERGY GOALS;
(III) IMPROVEMENTS TO EXISTING ENERGY RESOURCES AS
OPPOSED TO THE DEPLOYMENT OF NEW ENERGY RESOURCES;
(IV) BALANCING THE USE OF ELECTRICITY IMPORTED FROM
OUTSIDE THE STATE WITH THE DEVELOPMENT OF NEW ENERGY RESOURCES IN THE
STATE;
(V) FINANCIAL AND OTHER RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH RETIRING
ENERGY GENERATION RESOURCES;
(VI) DIRECTIONAL ASSESSING OF COST RISKS TO RATEPAYERS;
AND
(VII) IMPACTS TO THE WHOLESALE ENERGY MARKET AND BULK
POWER SYSTEM IN MEETING THE STATE’S POLICY GOALS RELATED TO ELECTRICITY.
(5) THE SCENARIOS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) AT LEAST ONE SCENARIO THAT EXAMINES THE
ACHIEVEMENT OF THE STATE’S CLEAN ENERGY GOALS;

SENATE BILL 909
(II) AT LEAST ONE SCENARIO THAT EXAMINES A LEAST–COST
APPROACH TO MEETING THE STATE’S PROJECTED ENERGY NEEDS; AND
(III) AT LEAST ONE SCENARIO THAT ASSUMES NO CHANGES IN
STATE ENERGY AND CLIMATE POLICIES.
(D) (1) THE RISK REPORT SHALL:
(I) BE INFORMED BY THE FORECASTS AND SCENARIOS
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION;
(II) PROVIDE INFORMATION ON THE RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH
SERVING THE IDENTIFIED ENERGY FORECASTS AND ACHIEVEMENT OF THE STATE’S
CLEAN ENERGY GOALS;
(III) DISCUSS THE POTENTIAL FINANCIAL IMPACTS OF THE
DIFFERENT SCENARIOS EXAMINED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION ON
THE STATE AND RATEPAYERS;
(IV) IDENTIFY THE FINANCIAL, RESOURCE ADEQUACY, AND
RELIABILITY RISKS OF THE WHOLESALE ENERGY MARKETS AND BULK POWER
SYSTEM ON RATEPAYERS; AND
(V) SPECIFY THE INPUTS AND ASSUMPTIONS USED IN
DEVELOPING THE RISK REPORT.
(2) (I) THE RISK REPORT SHALL ALSO INCLUDE ANY
RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE OFFICE REGARDING SHORT– AND LONG–TERM
SOLUTIONS TO MINIMIZE WHOLESALE ENERGY MARKET AND BULK POWER SYSTEM
FINANCIAL, RESOURCE ADEQUACY, AND RELIABILITY RISKS, INCLUDING
STRATEGIES TO IMPLEMENT ANY RECOMMENDATIONS.
(II) THE RECOMMENDATIONS MAY INCLUDE:
1. ENERGY GENERATION, TRANSMISSION, OR
DISTRIBUTION RESOURCE DEPLOYMENT OR DEMAND–SIDE MANAGEMENT
SOLUTIONS;
2. PROGRAM DEVELOPMENT, INCLUDING:
A. ALTERING OR ADDING TO EXISTING PROGRAMS; OR
B. PROPOSING NEW PROGRAMS;

SENATE BILL 909 13
3. STATUTORY OR REGULATORY CHANGES; AND
4. RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO
IMPLEMENT SHORT– AND LONG–TERM RECOMMENDATIONS IDENTIFIED IN
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, INCLUDING:
A. UTILIZING EXISTING OR CREATING NEW MARKET
STRUCTURES;
B. UTILIZING EXISTING OR CREATING NEW STATE
PROGRAMS;
C. STATE FINANCING OPTIONS, INCLUDING STATE
PROCUREMENT AND MULTISTATE PROCUREMENT;
D. ELECTRIC COMPANY PROCUREMENT OR PROGRAMS;
E. EXAMINING THE MIX OF IN–STATE GENERATION
VERSUS RELYING ON IMPORTS AND DEMAND–SIDE MANAGEMENT; AND
F. ANY OTHER RECOMMENDATIONS THAT THE OFFICE
CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE.
(III) IF THE OFFICE DETERMINES THAT THE IDENTIFIED RISKS
ARE ACCEPTABLE OR THAT EXISTING MARKET DESIGNS, PROCESSES, OR POLICIES
WILL ADEQUATELY ADDRESS THE RISKS IDENTIFIED IN THE RISK REPORT, THE
OFFICE MAY RECOMMEND THAT NO ACTIONS BE TAKEN.
(IV) THE OFFICE SHALL SUPPORT THE RECOMMENDATIONS BY
ANALYSES THAT BALANCE AFFORDABILITY, RELIABILITY, AND GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS REDUCTIONS.
7–1204.
(A) (1) THE OFFICE SHALL:
(I) DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN THE TOOLS AND RESOURCES
NECESSARY TO COMPLETE THE ANALYSES REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) COORDINATE WITH PJM INTERCONNECTION, LLC TO
DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN THE TOOLS NECESSARY TO COMPLETE THE ANALYSES
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;

SENATE BILL 909
(III) HAVE THE ABILITY TO CONDUCT COST–BENEFIT ANALYSES
OF:
1. ENERGY GENERATION RESOURCES IN WHOLESALE
ENERGY MARKETS; AND
2. DIFFERENT FORMS OF LEVELIZED COSTS OF
ELECTRICITY AND LEVELIZED FULL SYSTEM COSTS OF ELECTRICITY; AND
(IV) PROVIDE AN OPPORTUNITY FOR STAKEHOLDER FEEDBACK
ON ANY REPORTS DEVELOPED BY THE OFFICE.
(2) (I) FOR THE RISK REPORT REQUIRED UNDER § 7–1203 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE OFFICE SHALL CONDUCT A STAKEHOLDER PROCESS TO SOLICIT
FEEDBACK REGARDING THE DEVELOPMENT OF DATA INPUTS THAT WILL INFORM
THE FORECASTS AND SCENARIOS FOR DEVELOPING THE RISK REPORT.
(II) THE OFFICE IS NOT REQUIRED TO UTILIZE THE FEEDBACK
RECEIVED FROM THE STAKEHOLDER PROCESS CONDUCTED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, BUT SHALL PROVIDE DOCUMENTATION OF THE
STAKEHOLDER PROCESS IN THE RISK REPORT.
(3) (I) IN ADDITION TO THE PUBLIC HEARING REQUIRED IN §
7–1206 OF THIS SUBTITLE, AFTER THE PUBLICATION OF THE RISK REPORT OR ANY
UPDATE TO THE REPORT, THE OFFICE SHALL CONDUCT A STAKEHOLDER PROCESS
TO DEVELOP A REPORT THAT ASSESSES STRATEGIES TO ADDRESS THE IDENTIFIED
RISKS AND RECOMMENDATIONS IN THE RISK REPORT.
(II) WHEN ASSESSING STRATEGIES UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THERE SHALL BE CONSIDERATION OF:
1. NEW OR EXISTING PROGRAMS;
2. LEVERAGING TECHNOLOGY ENHANCEMENTS;
3. REVISED REGULATORY STRUCTURES;
4. STATE COORDINATION OF FEDERAL SOLUTIONS;
5. UTILIZING MARKET MECHANISMS; AND
6. ANY OTHER FACTORS CONSIDERED APPROPRIATE.

SENATE BILL 909 15
(B) THE OFFICE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSION AND THE
MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION, SHALL COMPLETE ENERGY MODELING FOR
THE RISK REPORT.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE SENATE
COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE HOUSE
ECONOMIC MATTERS COMMITTEE MAY JOINTLY REQUEST THE OFFICE TO ASSESS
UP TO FIVE POLICY SCENARIOS.
(2) NOT LATER THAN 1 YEAR AFTER THE DATE THE OFFICE RECEIVES
A REQUEST UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE OFFICE SHALL
SUBMIT A REPORT OF THE RESULTS OF THE REQUESTED POLICY SCENARIOS TO THE
SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE
HOUSE ECONOMIC MATTERS COMMITTEE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
7–1205.
(A) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2028, AND EVERY 3 YEARS THEREAFTER,
THE OFFICE SHALL SUBMIT THE RISK REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY.
(B) (1) THE OFFICE MAY SUBMIT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY ANY ADDITIONAL UPDATES TO THE RISK REPORT AT ANY TIME.
(2) THE UPDATES SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE STATUS OF AND ANY CHANGES TO THE FORECASTS AND
SCENARIOS DEVELOPED UNDER § 7–1203 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) INFORMATION ON ANY NEW FORECASTS AND SCENARIOS
THE OFFICE HAS DEVELOPED; AND
(III) ANY OTHER CHANGES TO THE INFORMATION OR
RECOMMENDATIONS CONTAINED IN THE REPORT OR ANY PRECEDING UPDATES TO
THE REPORT.
(C) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2028, AND EVERY 3 YEARS THEREAFTER,
THE OFFICE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THE
REPORT REQUIRED UNDER § 7–1204(A)(3) OF THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 909
7–1206.
(A) BEGINNING ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2030, AND AT LEAST ONCE
EVERY 3 YEARS THEREAFTER, AFTER RECEIVING A REQUEST BY THE OFFICE, THE
COMMISSION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE, SHALL CONDUCT A PUBLIC
PROCEEDING TO ASSESS THE RESULTS AND RECOMMENDATIONS CONTAINED IN THE
RISK REPORT AND ANY UPDATES TO THE REPORT.
(B) THE PUBLIC PROCEEDING SHALL INCLUDE A PUBLIC HEARING AND AN
OPPORTUNITY FOR PUBLIC COMMENT ON THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE RISK
REPORT AND ANY UPDATES TO THE REPORT.
(C) THE OFFICE SHALL CONSIDER ANY FEEDBACK RECEIVED THROUGH
THE PUBLIC PROCEEDING AND DETERMINE IF ANY FURTHER CHANGES TO THE RISK
REPORT ARE NECESSARY.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER ANY FEEDBACK RECEIVED
THROUGH THE PUBLIC PROCEEDING AND DETERMINE WHETHER ANY ACTION
UNDER ITS JURISDICTION IS WARRANTED.
7–1207.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER § 7–1204(A)(3) OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER § 7–1204(C)(2) OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) EACH REPORT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL INCLUDE
DOCUMENTATION OF STAKEHOLDER ENGAGEMENT AND ANY FEEDBACK RECEIVED
RELATED TO THE DEVELOPMENT OF THAT REPORT.
7–1203.
(A) THE OFFICE SHALL DEVELOP A 25–YEAR COMPREHENSIVE ENERGY
FORECAST.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FORECAST IS TO ANALYZE ENERGY SCENARIOS
AND POLICY OPTIONS FOR MEETING THE STATE’S ENERGY NEEDS AND
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTION GOALS WHILE ENSURING ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM RELIABILITY AND COST–EFFECTIVENESS CONSISTENT WITH
THE LONG–TERM ENERGY NEEDS OF THE STATE.

SENATE BILL 909 17
(C) THE FORECAST SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) REASONABLE PROJECTIONS FOR ELECTRICITY LOAD AND
DEMAND FROM 2025 THROUGH 2050 THAT INCLUDE:
(I) STATEWIDE DEMAND ELEMENTS; AND
(II) DEMAND ELEMENTS FOR SPECIFIC ELECTRIC SERVICE
TERRITORIES;
(2) SCENARIOS FOR MEETING:
(I) STATE ENERGY NEEDS AND GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS
REDUCTION GOALS; AND
(II) LOAD FORECASTS IN THE PJM REGION, AS DEFINED IN §
7–101 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(3) A STRATEGY TO MEET THE SCENARIO THAT THE OFFICE
DETERMINES BEST MEETS THE NEEDS STATED IN ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
THAT INCLUDES:
(I) INFORMATION ON THE SCENARIO’S IMPACT ON ENERGY
RELIABILITY AND GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTIONS;
(II) THE FINANCIAL IMPACT OF THE SCENARIO ON THE STATE
AND RATEPAYERS;
(III) 1. SHORT– AND LONG–TERM RECOMMENDATIONS FOR
THE GENERATION, DISTRIBUTION, TRANSMISSION, AND STORAGE OF ELECTRICITY,
SUPPORTED BY ANALYSES THAT BALANCE AFFORDABILITY, RELIABILITY, AND
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTIONS; AND
2. RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO
IMPLEMENT THE SHORT– AND LONG–TERM RECOMMENDATIONS;
(IV) LOCATIONAL VALUE ESTIMATIONS INCLUDING PRIORITY
GENERATION AND TRANSMISSION ZONES ATTRACTIVE FOR RESOURCE
DEVELOPMENT;
(V) A SUMMARY OF RELEVANT REGULATORY AND
ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURES THAT COULD BE STREAMLINED OR MODERNIZED
FOR GREATER EFFICIENCY;

SENATE BILL 909
(VI) THE USE OF ALL BEST AVAILABLE TECHNOLOGIES AND
TECHNOLOGIES THAT MAY BECOME AVAILABLE IN THE FUTURE;
(VII) SENSITIVITIES RELATED TO VARIOUS LEVELS OF
ELECTRIFICATION AND THE ADOPTION OF LOAD FLEXIBILITY AND DISTRIBUTED
ENERGY RESOURCES;
(VIII) METHODS FOR ACHIEVING 60%, 80%, AND 100% OF THE
STATE’S ENERGY NEEDS THROUGH IN–STATE GENERATION;
(IX) AN INDEPENDENT RATEPAYER IMPACT ANALYSIS;
(X) RELATED INVESTMENTS IN ELECTRICITY AND GAS
INFRASTRUCTURE, INCLUDING ANY INTERPLAY BETWEEN THE TWO;
(XI) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND WORKFORCE
OPPORTUNITIES;
(XII) STATE FINANCING OPTIONS, INCLUDING STATE
PROCUREMENT AND MULTISTATE PROCUREMENT;
(XIII) UTILITY BUSINESS MODELS, TARIFFS, AND COST RECOVERY;
(XIV) SUPPORTIVE MARKET STUDIES;
(XV) PLANS FOR LEVERAGING AVAILABLE FEDERAL FUNDS; AND
(XVI) KEY FINDINGS FROM THE STUDY REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 30, 2026, THE OFFICE SHALL
CONDUCT A STUDY TO SUPPORT THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE FORECAST.
(2) THE OFFICE SHALL HIRE A PRIVATE CONSULTANT TO MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(3) AS PART OF THE STUDY:
(I) THE COMMISSION SHALL STUDY:
1. THE VIABILITY OF ENERGY STORAGE AS A
TRANSMISSION ASSET;

SENATE BILL 909 19
2. THE NECESSITY OF AN INDEPENDENT DISTRIBUTION
OPERATOR; AND
3. IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND ENERGY
ADMINISTRATION, RECONDUCTORING OPPORTUNITIES IN THE STATE;
(II) THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION SHALL STUDY
THE FEASIBILITY OF PLACING SMALL MODULAR REACTORS ON FORMER
ELECTRICITY GENERATION SITES; AND
(III) THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM SHALL STUDY
STATE LAND SUITABLE FOR SOLAR ENERGY DEVELOPMENT.
(4) THE STUDY SHALL:
(I) INCLUDE AN ANALYSIS, MADE IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION, OF METHODS FOR REDUCING
TRANSMISSION–CONSTRAINED AREAS THROUGH THE USE OF EXISTING
RIGHTS–OF–WAY;
(II) INCLUDE THE FEASIBILITY AND EFFICACY OF:
1. BROADENING THE STATE’S POWER PURCHASE
AGREEMENT AUTHORITY;
2. DEVELOPING ELECTRICITY PROCUREMENT PLANS TO
ENSURE ADEQUATE, RELIABLE, AFFORDABLE, EFFICIENT, AND ENVIRONMENTALLY
SUSTAINABLE ELECTRICITY SERVICE AT THE LOWEST TOTAL COST OVER TIME,
TAKING INTO ACCOUNT ANY PRICE STABILITY BENEFITS; AND
3. CONDUCTING COMPETITIVE PROCUREMENT
PROCESSES TO PROCURE THE RESOURCES IDENTIFIED IN THE PROCUREMENT
PLANS UNDER ITEM (II) OF THIS ITEM; AND
(III) INCLUDE AND INCORPORATE THE RESULTS OF THE STUDIES
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(5) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE OFFICE SHALL SUBMIT
A REPORT OF ITS FINDINGS AND ANY RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
7–1204.

SENATE BILL 909
(A) THE OFFICE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSION AND THE
MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION, SHALL COMPLETE ENERGY MODELING FOR
THE STRATEGY AND SCENARIOS INCLUDED IN THE FORECAST UNDER § 7–1203 OF
THIS SUBTITLE, AND FOR ANY CHANGES TO THE STRATEGY SET FORTH IN THE
FORECAST, THAT:
(1) ENABLES COST–BENEFIT ANALYSES OF ELECTRICITY PRICES BY
RESOURCE MIX TYPE;
(2) CONSIDERS THE TIMELINE FOR COMMERCIALIZATION OF ENERGY
TECHNOLOGIES AND WHEN THOSE TECHNOLOGIES MAY BECOME COST–EFFECTIVE;
(3) PROVIDES LOCATIONAL VALUE PLANNING;
(4) HAS THE ABILITY TO RUN POLICY SCENARIOS ANNUALLY IN
ORDER TO PROVIDE EFFECTIVE FEEDBACK TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY;
(5) CONSIDERS WHETHER THE TRANSITION TO DISTRIBUTED
RENEWABLE ENERGY IS DELIVERING SUFFICIENT ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM
RELIABILITY OR WHETHER THERE ARE VULNERABILITIES THAT NEED TO BE
ADDRESSED;
(6) STRENGTHENS THE DIVERSITY, SUSTAINABILITY, AND
RESILIENCE OF THE ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM;
(7) ENHANCES THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM AND
DEMAND–SIDE MANAGEMENT; AND
(8) MAY BE UPDATED ANNUALLY BASED ON STRATEGIES, POLICY
DECISIONS, AND PERIODIC REASSESSMENTS OF THE STATE’S ENERGY PORTFOLIO
TO REMAIN UP–TO–DATE WITH THE EVOLUTION OF ENERGY GENERATION AND
TRANSMISSION.
(B) THE OFFICE SHALL PROVIDE A 45–DAY PERIOD FOR PUBLIC COMMENT
ON ANY MODELING COMPLETED UNDER THIS SECTION.
7–1205.
ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2027, AND EVERY 2 YEARS THEREAFTER, THE
OFFICE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY A REPORT ON:

SENATE BILL 909 21
(1) THE STATUS OF THE FORECAST DEVELOPED UNDER § 7–1203 OF
THIS SUBTITLE AND ANY CHANGES TO THE STRATEGY SET FORTH IN THE FORECAST;
AND
(2) (I) ANY ENERGY MODELING COMPLETED UNDER § 7–1204 OF
THIS SUBTITLE IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 2–YEAR PERIOD; AND
(II) ANY PUBLIC COMMENTS SUBMITTED IN RELATION TO THE
MODELING.
7–1206.
(A) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2025, THE COMMISSION, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE, SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS REQUIRING EACH
ELECTRIC COMPANY TO DEVELOP AN INTEGRATED RESOURCE PLAN TO:
(1) FACILITATE ACHIEVING THE STATE’S GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS REDUCTIONS GOALS;
(2) FULFILL THE COMPANY’S OBLIGATION TO CHARGE JUST AND
REASONABLE RATES;
(3) MINIMIZE OR MITIGATE IMPACTS ON RATEPAYERS IN THE STATE;
(4) ENSURE BOTH SHORT–TERM AND LONG–TERM ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM RELIABILITY, INCLUDING MEETING THE RESOURCE
ADEQUACY NEEDS OF THE STATE;
(5) STRENGTHEN THE DIVERSITY, SUSTAINABILITY, AND RESILIENCE
OF THE ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM;
(6) ENHANCE THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM AND
DEMAND–SIDE MANAGEMENT; AND
(7) MINIMIZE LOCALIZED AIR POLLUTANTS AND OTHER GREENHOUSE
GAS EMISSIONS, WITH PRIORITY INITIALLY GIVEN TO UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES
OR OVERBURDENED COMMUNITIES AS DEFINED IN § 1–701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT
ARTICLE.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL
SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION THE INTEGRATED RESOURCE PLAN REQUIRED UNDER
THIS SECTION.

SENATE BILL 909
(2) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2031, AND EVERY 5 YEARS THEREAFTER,
EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE COMMISSION AN UPDATE ON
THE INTEGRATED RESOURCE PLAN REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) The Public Service Commission shall study the effectiveness of an
independent distribution operator.
(2) On or before December 31, 2026, the Public Service Commission shall
submit to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, a report on the study required under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(b) (1) The Department of Transportation shall study methods for reducing
transmission–constrained areas through the use of existing rights–of–way.
(2) On or before December 31, 2026, the Department of Transportation
shall submit to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, a report on the study required under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(c) (1) (i) The Maryland Energy Administration shall obtain existing
power flow analyses for electric system reliability in the State that are related to currently
known electric generation facility retirements.
(ii) If the Maryland Energy Administration is unable to obtain the
existing power flow analyses under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, then the
Administration, with the support of the Public Service Commission, shall develop a power
flow analysis for electric system reliability in the State that is related to currently known
electric generation facility retirements.
(iii) On or before January 1, 2026, the Maryland Energy
Administration shall submit to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly a report on the power flow analyses required
under this paragraph.
(2) (i) On or before December 31, 2025, and on or before December 31,
2026, the Maryland Energy Administration shall provide to the General Assembly, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, an update on the status of the
National Renewable Energy Laboratory’s analysis on resource adequacy conducted at the
request of the Administration.
(ii) On receipt of the National Renewable Energy Laboratory’s final
analysis on resource adequacy, the Maryland Energy Administration shall submit a final
report on the analysis to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.

SENATE BILL 909 23
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before September 1,
2027, the Strategic Energy Planning Office shall submit to the Governor and, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly a status update on
the development of the Comprehensive Wholesale Energy Markets and Bulk Power System
Risk Report developed under § 7–1203 of the Public Utilities Article, as enacted by Section
1 of this Act.
SECTION 2. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.